Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.600

Off-street parking space and facilities—Construction.

Insofar as the provisions of RCW 35.27.550 through 35.27.600 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of RCW 35.27.550 through 35.27.600 shall be controlling.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.600. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 7.]